Massachusetts, session 194th, H2692.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding and general or special law to the contrary, all certifications
and training programs for cutting, welding, and hot works processes shall be performed using the
existing National Fire Protection Association program or an equivalent program that includes a
thorough and accessible electronic database that can be used to check a worker's status, multi-
lingual in-class offerings, identity integrity safeguards, in-person original training, and
subsequent annual continued education program either online or in person.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of Chapter 148 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following: ""Criminal Negligence", Repeated,
reckless, and knowing failure to comply with the regulations contained in this chapter, and
failure to perceive a substantial and unjustifiable risk that a result would occur from said failure.
of 3

The risk must be of such nature and degree that failure to perceive it constitutes a gross deviation
from the standard of care that a reasonable person would observe in this situation."
SECTION 3. Section 34B of chapter 148 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby
amended by striking out the section in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following:
"SECTION 34B. Any person who wantonly or recklessly violates the state building code or state
fire code and thereby causes serious bodily injury to any person shall be punished by a fine of
not more than $250,000 or by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than 5 years or in a
house of correction for not more than 21/2 years, or both. Any person who wantonly or
recklessly violates the state building code or state fire code and thereby causes death to any
person shall be punished by a fine of not more than $500,000 and/or by imprisonment in the state
prison for not more than 7 years or in a house of correction for not more than 5 years, or both.
Any person found to have acted in accordance with the definition of criminal negligence in
section 1 of this chapter may be determined to be criminally liable for damage or death stemming
from repeated and reckless non-compliance with requirements set forth in this chapter. For
purposes of this section, ''serious bodily injury'' shall mean bodily injury that results in a
permanent disfigurement, loss or impairment of a bodily function, limb or organ, or a substantial
risk of death. SECTION 4. Section 34 of Chapter 148 is hereby amended by striking out the
section in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the following: "Section 34. Except as
otherwise provided, any person violating any provision of this chapter shall be liable to a fine of
one hundred dollars, or, in case of a continuing offence after notice of such violation, to a fine of
not more than one hundred dollars for every day during which the violation continues, unless
said violation pertains to cutting, welding, or hot works processes. In the event of any person
violating regulations regarding cutting, welding, or hot works processes, said person shall be
of 3

liable to the following punishments: First offense: a fine of not more than $1,000 Second
offense: a fine of not more than $2,000 and/or imprisonment in the house of correction for up to
a year, provided that the Judge shall have the authority to take into account the size of the project
on which the violation occurred and levy additional fines if the total cost said project is such that
the fine is inadequate to deter continued offenses. Third and continuing offenses: a fine of not
more than .025% of the total project value, or $10,000, whichever is greater, and/or
imprisonment in the house of correction for up to 3 years." SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any
general or special law to the contrary, the Department of Fire Safety shall, in consultation with
the Department of Professional Licensure, or any other executive agency or department it deems
necessary, establish a system of public notification and recording of non-compliance with
regulations and statues pertaining to cutting, welding, and hot works processes. Said system may
include: quarterly publications, an online database, an automated notification system to alert
property owners, and/or communication with insurance companies.
of 3